Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB455.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Building a Better Future Grant Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Program." The Building a Better Future Grant Program established under section 3."WIOA." The provisions of 29 U.S.C. Ch. 32 (relating to 12345678910111213141516171819 workforce innovation and opportunity).Section 3. Program.(a) Establishment.--The Building a Better Future Grant Program is established within the department.(b) Purpose.--The program shall provide grants to organizations that host or offer comprehensive education, workforce training and skills development to individuals 16 to 24 years of age who have been disconnected from other educational opportunities. An organization shall be located in this Commonwealth and focused on construction and building trades, and may also include workforce development offerings in health care, customer service, child care and other vocational training and certifications that are relevant to local labor market opportunities.Section 4. Eligibility.(a) Participant requirements.--To be eligible for the program, an organization must enroll individuals 16 to 24 years of age who can provide self-attestation that the individual is a member of a low-income family and meets at least two of the following:(1) has previously been convicted or adjudicated delinquent;(2) is the child of an incarcerated parent, a parent who has been released from a term of incarceration on parole or who is serving a sentence on probation;(3) has been placed in foster care;(4) has a disability;(5) is the child of migrant laborers;(6) has dropped out of school before graduation or has dropped out and subsequently reenrolled;20250HB0455PN0437 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) is experiencing homelessness;(8) has foundational skills needs or is basic-skills deficient;(9) is pregnant or parenting;(10) is part of another young-adult population, including a racial group, that is experiencing disparate levels of youth disconnection as defined by the local workforce development board; or(11) was approved for participation or enrollment in WIOA Youth Formula Services or Job Corps.(b) Organization requirements.--In order to receive a grant award, an organization must provide to participants at least two or more of the following:(1) work experience and skills training;(2) occupational skills training;(3) other paid and unpaid work experiences, including internships and job shadowing;(4) services and activities necessary for participants to achieve a high school diploma or equivalency;(5) counseling services and other wraparound services;(6) activities designed to foster leadership development; or(7) career services, including job search, placement and follow-up support.Section 5. Grant award.(a) Duties of department.--The department shall develop guidelines that specify requirements for grants. The guidelines shall include:(1) The grant application process and timeline.(2) Allowed and disallowed expenses.20250HB0455PN0437 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The method by which individuals who apply for grants are evaluated.(b) Awards.--The department may not award a grant in excess of $1,000,000 per organization. Up to 5% of money available for grants may be awarded to a Statewide nonprofit that serves multiple organizations that have been awarded funding under the program to provide technical assistance to those organizations.Section 6. Reports.An organization awarded a grant from the program shall provide program and fiscal reports as required by the department.Section 7. Appropriation.The sum of $5,000,000 is appropriated from the General Fund to the department to provide grants for the program.Section 8. Additional funding.In addition to the appropriation provided under section 7, the department may:(1) Expend money from the restricted accounts administered by the department for the program.(2) Accept grants, gifts, donations and other payments.(3) Expend money appropriated to the department for the program after the effective date of this section.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0455PN0437 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324